Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.250

Environmental mitigation activities.

(1) Any county authorized to acquire and operate utilities or conduct other proprietary or user or ratepayer funded activities may develop and make publicly available a plan for the county to reduce its greenhouse gases emissions or achieve no-net emissions from all sources of greenhouse gases that such county utility or proprietary or user or ratepayer funded activity owns, operates, leases, uses, contracts for, or otherwise controls.

(2) Any county authorized to acquire and operate utilities or conduct other proprietary or user or ratepayer funded activities may, as part of such utility or activity, reduce or mitigate the environmental impacts, such as greenhouse gases emissions, of such utility and other proprietary or user or ratepayer funded activity. The mitigation may include, but is not limited to, all greenhouse gases mitigation mechanisms recognized by independent, qualified organizations with proven experience in emissions mitigation activities. Mitigation mechanisms may include the purchase, trade, and banking of carbon offsets or credits. Ratepayer funds, fees, or other revenue dedicated to a county utility or other proprietary or user or ratepayer funded activity may be spent to reduce or mitigate the environmental impacts of greenhouse gases emitted as a result of that function. If a state greenhouse gases registry is established, the county that has purchased, traded, or banked greenhouse gases mitigation mechanisms under this section shall receive credit in the registry.

[ 2007 c 349 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2007 c 349 s 6: "The legislature finds and declares that greenhouse gases offset contracts, credits, and other greenhouse gases mitigation efforts are a recognized utility purpose that confers a direct benefit on the utility's ratepayers. The legislature also finds and declares that greenhouse gases offset contracts, credits, and other greenhouse gases mitigation efforts are a recognized purpose of other county proprietary activities that are funded by users and ratepayers, and that such mitigation efforts confer a direct benefit on such payers. The legislature declares that section 6 of this act is intended to reverse the result of Okeson v. City of Seattle (January 18, 2007), by expressly granting counties the statutory authority to engage in mitigation activities to offset the impact on the environment of their utilities and certain other proprietary and user and ratepayer funded activities." [ 2007 c 349 s 5.]